apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="/bad__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>bad</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>worse</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>worst</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ar__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>urther</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>arther</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>urthest</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>arthest</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="glad/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>der</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>dest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="broad/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="drab/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ber</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>best</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="flat/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ter</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>test</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fun/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ner</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>nest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="glum/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>mest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up/__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>per</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>pest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mine__adj">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maybe__adv">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="very__preadv">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="where__adv">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="that__cnjsub">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="the__det">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__det">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>n</l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="another__det">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="other__det">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="several__det">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="her__det">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="really" i=""><i>really</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="northeast" i=""><i>northeast</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="where" i=""><i>where</i><par n="where__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="neither" i=""><i>neither</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="that" i=""><i>that</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
                            <e lm="no fixed abode" i=""><i>no<b/>fixed<b/>abode</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="depending upon" i=""><i>depending<b/>upon</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="hastily" i=""><i>hastily</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
                            <e r="RL" i=""><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="a__det"/></e>
                            <e r="LR" i=""><i>a</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="any" i=""><i>any</i><par n="other__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="every" i=""><i>every</i><par n="another__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="its" i=""><i>its</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="other" i=""><i>other</i><par n="other__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="our" i=""><i>our</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="several" i=""><i>several</i><par n="several__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="the" i=""><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="various" i=""><i>various</i><par n="several__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="your" i=""><i>your</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="such a" i=""><i>such a</i><par n="another__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="such" i=""><i>such</i><par n="other__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="bad" i=""><i/><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="broad" i=""><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="far" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="flat" i=""><i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="fun" i=""><i>fun</i><par n="fun/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="glad" i=""><i>glad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="his" i=""><i>his</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="mad" i=""><i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="mine" i=""><i>mine</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="ours" i=""><i>ours</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="red" i=""><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="sad" i=""><i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="theirs" i=""><i>theirs</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="as" i=""><i>as</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="so" i=""><i>so</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="little" i=""><i>little</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="where" i=""><i>where</i><par n="where__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="while" i=""><i>while</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="or" i=""><i>or</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="though" i=""><i>though</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
                            <e lm="that" i=""><i>that</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
                            <e lm="frenetically" i=""><i>frenetically</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="whenever" i=""><i>whenever</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
                            <e lm="glib" i=""><i>glib</i><par n="drab/__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="whither" i=""><i>whither</i><par n="where__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="whatsoever" i=""><i>whatsoever</i><par n="another__det"/></e>
